Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
662

STATE TORT
LIABILITY ACT

Section

662-1 Definitions

662-2 Waiver and liability of State

662-3 Jurisdiction

662-4 Statute of limitations

662-5 Jury

662-6 Pleadings, trial and appeal

662-7 Attorney general

662-8 Interest

662-9 Costs

662-10 Judgment as bar

662-11 Compromise

662-12 Attorney's fees

662-13 No awards except upon legal evidence

662-14 Exclusiveness of remedy

662-15 Exceptions

662-16 Defense of state employees

662-17 Benefits and obligations of parents of
minor employees

662-18 Conclusive presumptions; unexploded
ordnance on

Kaho‘olawe and in the ocean adjacent to
Kaho‘olawe

662-19 Limited liability for skateboarding
activities in

public skateboard parks

Cross References

Government entity as a tortfeasor; abolition of joint
and several liability, see §663-10.5.

Law Journals and Reviews

Tort and Insurance "Reform" in a Common
Law Court. 14 UH L. Rev. 55 (1992).

Ala Loop and the Private Right of Action Under Hawai‘i
Constitution Article XI, Section 9: Charting a Path Toward a Cohesive
Enforcement Scheme. 33 UH L. Rev. 367 (2010).

Case Notes

Determination of whether a state function is discretionary,
discussed. 71 H. 581, 799 P.2d 959 (1990).

Counties do not fall within the ambit of the State Tort
Liability Act; §46-72 is the statute of limitations applicable to actions
against the counties. 104 H. 341, 90 P.3d 233 (2004).

Petitioner's claim for alleged negligence by the department
of education (DOE) in evaluating petitioner's proposal, and in deciding the
dispute with petitioner, was barred under this chapter because the DOE's
conduct was not analogous to "a recognized claim for relief against a
private person"; petitioner did not identify circumstances under which a
private party could be sued for negligently applying the law, rules, or a
request for proposals in awarding a government contract. 127 H. 263, 277 P.3d
988 (2012).

State has not waived sovereign immunity from 42 U.S.C. §1983
actions. 6 H. App. 397, 721 P.2d 165 (1986).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next